New York, session 2025-2026, S9857.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (b) of subdivision 2 of section 5-508 of the 2 election law, as amended by chapter 521 of the laws of 2021, is amended 3 to read as follows: 4 (b) Upon application made to the board of elections pursuant to para- 5 graph (a) of this subdivision, the board of elections shall ensure that 6 any registration record kept or maintained in accordance with this arti- 7 cle and any other records with respect to such victim of domestic 8 violence be kept separate and apart from other such records and not be 9 made available for inspection or copying by the public or any other 10 person, except election officials acting within the course and scope of 11 their official duties and only as pertinent and necessary in connection 12 therewith. The confidentiality of such registration records shall begin 13 upon the board's acceptance of such sworn statement and continue for 14 four years from such date. A new application may be made prior to the 15 expiration of such [four year] four-year period. The board of elections 16 shall provide written notice to such victim no later than six months 17 prior to the expiration of such four-year period to inform them of the 18 upcoming expiration and the opportunity to reapply. 19 § 2. Paragraph (e) of subdivision 2 of section 108 of the executive 20 law, as added by chapter 502 of the laws of 2011, is amended to read as 21 follows: 22 (e) Participants shall be certified for four years following the date 23 of filing, unless the certification is withdrawn or cancelled before 24 that date. The secretary shall promulgate rules and regulations for 25 renewal of applications pursuant to this section, including, but not 26 limited to, requiring that written notice be provided to the participant 27 no later than six months prior to the expiration of such four-year peri- EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15193-01-6 S. 9857 2 1 od to inform the participant of the upcoming expiration and the opportu- 2 nity to reapply. 3 § 3. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall 4 have become a law.